test/src/morphology/proper_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernoun - Birtsse: # MARJA-sur
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Nom: Birtsse 
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen: Birtse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Acc: Birtsev
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ine: Birtsen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ill: Birtssaj
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ela: Birtses
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Com: Birtsejn
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Nom: Birtse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Ill: Birtsejda
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Ess: Birtssen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
